Maine, session 132, LD1319.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §6412, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. Process for suspension for failing to comply with daily reporting by
harvesters of marine organisms that have daily reporting requirements. If the
commissioner determines that an individual licensed or certified to fish for marine
organisms under this Part has failed to comply with a daily reporting requirement
established in rule adopted by the department pursuant to section 6173, the commissioner
may notify the individual by e-mail at the e-mail address provided on the application for
the license or certificate. If the individual has not complied with the reporting requirements
within 2 days of the requirement to submit the report, the commissioner may mail a notice
to the individual. The notice is deemed received 3 days after the mailing. The notice must:
A. Describe the information that the individual is required to provide that the
department has not received; and
B. State that, unless all the information described in paragraph A is provided to the
department or the individual requests a hearing, the license or certificate will be
suspended 3 business days after the individual's receipt of the notice.
Notwithstanding subsection 4, if the individual has not complied with the reporting
requirements or requested a hearing within 3 business days after receipt of the notice, the
commissioner shall suspend the license or certificate.
Page 1 - 132LR0357(03)